Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 6 Justices of the Supreme Court, Judges of the Court of Appeals, and Their Employees

47-2-240.
Membership in retirement system of Justices of Supreme Court; appointment to Justice Emeritus of Supreme Court; contributions; creditable service; survivors benefits.

For purposes of this Code section, the terms “Justice Emeritus of the Supreme Court” and “Justice Emeritus” mean both Chief Justice Emeritus and Associate Justice Emeritus, and the term “Justice” means both Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and Associate Justice of the Supreme Court. The provisions of this or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, any person who becomes a Justice of the Supreme Court after April 1, 1964, shall be a member of the retirement system and shall not be eligible for appointment as Justice Emeritus of the Supreme Court. The prohibition against appointment as Justice Emeritus shall not apply to any person holding either the office of Justice of the Supreme Court or Judge of the Court of Appeals on April 1, 1964. Any person serving as Justice of the Supreme Court on that date must notify the director of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia on or before March 31, 1965, if he desires to become a member of the retirement system and shall otherwise be ineligible for membership. No Justice of the Supreme Court shall be allowed to rescind notification nor shall he be allowed to give notification after March 31, 1965. Any Justice of the Supreme Court who becomes a member of the retirement system shall, upon the effective date of his membership, begin making regular employee contributions under this chapter and shall be entitled to all the retirement allowances and credits under this chapter in the same manner as if he had become a member of the retirement system on January 1, 1950, which credits shall include credit for prior service and any services performed by him as an employee subsequent to that date. All employer contributions which would have been reported for the Justices of the Supreme Court between January 1, 1950, and April 1, 1964, shall be paid by the employer into the pension accumulation fund in such manner and over such period of time as shall be agreed upon between the board of trustees and the employer. Eligibility for survivors benefits under Code Section 47-2-128 for a present Justice of the Supreme Court shall be determined on the same basis as that applicable to all other members who were in state employment on or after January 1, 1953, and benefit amounts shall be based upon the age of the Justice on the effective date of his membership. Eligibility for survivors benefits for any person who enters on duty as a Justice after April 1, 1964, shall be determined in the same manner as for any other new member of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 179, § 1.

47-2-241.
Membership in retirement system of Judges of Court of Appeals; appointment to Judge Emeritus of Court of Appeals; contributions; creditable service; survivors benefits.

The provisions of this or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, any person who becomes a Judge of the Court of Appeals after April 1, 1964, shall be a member of the retirement system and shall not be eligible for appointment as Judge Emeritus of the Court of Appeals. The prohibition against such appointment shall not apply to any person holding the office of Judge of the Court of Appeals on April 1, 1964. Any person serving as Judge of the Court of Appeals on that date must notify the director of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia on or before March 31, 1965, if he desires to become a member of the retirement system and shall otherwise be ineligible for membership. No Judge of the Court of Appeals shall be allowed to rescind notification nor shall he be allowed to give notification after March 31, 1965. Any Judge of the Court of Appeals who becomes a member of the retirement system shall, upon the effective date of his membership, begin making regular employee contributions under this chapter and shall be entitled to all retirement allowances and credits under this chapter in the same manner as if he had become a member of the retirement system on January 1, 1950, which credits shall include credit for prior service and any services performed by him as an employee subsequent to that date. All employer contributions which would have been reported for the Judges of the Court of Appeals between January 1, 1950, and April 1, 1964, shall be paid by the employer into the pension accumulation fund in such manner and over such period of time as shall be agreed upon between the board of trustees and the employer. Eligibility for survivors benefits under Code Section 47-2-128 shall be determined on the same basis as that applicable to all other members who were in state employment on or after January 1, 1953. The amounts of any survivors benefits payable shall be based upon the age of the Judge of the Court of Appeals on the effective date of his membership with the retirement system. Eligibility for survivors benefits for any person who enters on duty as a Judge of the Court of Appeals after April 1, 1964, shall be determined in the same manner as for any other new member of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 115, § 1.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-2-242.
Merit system of personnel administration for officers and employees of the Supreme Court; membership in retirement system; contributions.

All eligible officers and employees of the Supreme Court, except the Justices, shall be subject to a merit system of personnel administration as promulgated by the Supreme Court, under which all such officers and employees shall be selected on a basis of merit, fitness, and efficiency. All such officers and employees are authorized to become members of the retirement system. All contributions required by this chapter shall be paid from funds appropriated for the operation of the Supreme Court and all such payments shall be in addition to the regular compensation allowed to such officers and employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 229, § 1.

47-2-243.
Merit system of personnel administration for officers and employees of the Court of Appeals; membership in retirement system; contributions.

All eligible officers and employees of the Court of Appeals, except the judges of that court, shall be subject to a merit system of personnel administration as promulgated by the Court of Appeals, under which all such officers and employees shall be selected on a basis of merit, fitness, and efficiency. All such officers and employees are authorized to become members of the retirement system. All contributions required by this chapter shall be paid from funds appropriated for the operation of the Court of Appeals and all such payments shall be in addition to the regular compensation allowed to such officers and employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 248, § 1.

47-2-244.
Optional benefits available to appellate court judges; notice of election of benefits; eligibility for benefits; disability benefits; survivors benefits.

The term “appellate court judge,” as used in this Code section, shall mean any Judge, Presiding Judge, or Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals and any Associate Justice, Presiding Justice, or Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any appellate court judge shall be entitled to receive the benefits under this Code section in lieu of any retirement allowances otherwise available under this retirement system and in lieu of the appointment to or the holding of any emeritus office.

Any appellate court judge who seeks benefits under this Code section shall tender to the board of trustees before January 1, 1972, or within 60 days after the commencement of such judge’s term of office, whichever shall occur later, a written notice stating that the judge has elected to accept such benefits in lieu of any retirement allowances otherwise available under this retirement system and in lieu of the appointment to and the holding of any emeritus office. The notice shall state that in consideration of the payment of benefits under this Code section, such appellate court judge shall resign from office as an appellate court judge on or before the day upon which he or she attains 75 years of age or on the last day of the term in which such appellate court judge is serving when he or she attains age 70, whichever is later. Any notice filed prior to July 1, 1986, by an appellate court judge in active service on such date which contained an agreement to resign on or before such judge’s seventieth birthday shall be void and of no force and effect if such judge files a new notice containing an agreement to resign as provided in this subsection and such notice is filed on or before September 1, 1986.

As a condition of eligibility for benefits under this Code section, there shall have been deducted from the earnable compensation of an appellate court judge and remitted to the board of trustees a contribution equivalent to 7 1/2 percent of such judge’s earnable compensation for each pay period or part thereof after the date of such judge’s written notice of election of benefits. Election of benefits under this Code section constitutes an authorization and direction by that appellate court judge to the clerical personnel of such judge’s court to withhold such judge’s contributions and remit them to the board of trustees in the manner provided by the board of trustees, together with a sum of money available to the court from annual or supplemental appropriations in an amount sufficient to carry out this Code section.

Upon compliance with this Code section, an appellate court judge may retire and receive benefits under this Code section.

After ten years of service as an appellate court judge, such judge shall be entitled to receive during life a retirement benefit payable monthly equivalent to 75 percent of the salary of an appellate court judge then serving in the office from which such judge retired.

An appellate court judge who is incapacitated prior to the completion of ten years of service as an appellate court judge shall receive during life for each full year of service one-tenth of the benefit such judge would have received had such judge completed ten years of service as an appellate court judge. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “incapacitated” or “incapacity” means physical or mental disability for further performance of duties and shall not mean the attainment of any certain age.

The surviving spouse of an appellate court judge, provided such surviving spouse is the designated beneficiary, shall be entitled to receive a benefit payable monthly for life equivalent to 50 percent of the benefits to which the spouse would have been entitled based upon his or her years of service as an appellate court judge and without regard to whether such judge had attained age 65. However, if the designated beneficiary, or beneficiaries, is someone other than the surviving spouse of the deceased judge, then such named beneficiary or beneficiaries shall be entitled to receive a benefit payable monthly for life based on an actuarial equivalent, provided the actuarial equivalent shall not be in excess of 50 percent of the amount that would have been payable to the judge. For the purpose of this provision, in the event the beneficiary, or beneficiaries, is not the member’s spouse, the actuarial equivalent shall be computed based upon the assumption that the member had a spouse who was the same age as the member.

Survivors benefits shall be available to appellate court judges at prevailing contribution rates and subject to provisions of law and regulations of the board of trustees; provided, however, that no person who becomes or again becomes subject to the provisions of this Code section on or after July 1, 2009, shall be entitled to such survivors benefits.

If any appellate court judge dies without having received benefits under this Code section and is not survived by a designated beneficiary who is eligible to receive the benefits provided by this Code section, such judge’s contributions shall be paid to his or her estate without interest. If any appellate court judge and such judge’s designated beneficiary or beneficiaries die as the result of a common accident prior to the time at which the payment of benefits to the judge equals the total contributions made by such judge plus interest thereon, the difference shall be paid to the estate of the judge. If after retirement an appellate court judge and such judge’s designated beneficiary or beneficiaries die, but not as the result of a common accident, prior to the time at which the total benefits paid to the judge and such judge’s beneficiary or beneficiaries equal the total contributions made by such judge plus interest thereon, the difference shall be paid to the estate of the last decedent.

An appellate court judge who has accrued creditable service under this retirement system may convert such service in order to fulfill the conditions of this Code section on the basis of two years of creditable service being equivalent to one year of service credit under this Code section, provided that creditable service based upon the holding of office as an appellate court judge shall be convertible to service credit under this Code section on an equal time basis. Applications for conversion of service credits under this Code section shall be made in writing to the board of trustees.

Any appellate court judge who elects to receive the benefits provided for by this Code section and who fails to resign his office as appellate court judge on or before the day such judge attains age 75 or on the last day of the term in which such appellate court judge is serving when he or she attains age 70, whichever is later, or on or before June 30, 1972, in the event he or she attained age 70 on or prior to June 30, 1972, shall not be entitled to receive any benefits under this Code section and shall forfeit all contributions made under it.

No benefit shall be payable to an appellate court judge under this Code section until such judge reaches 65 years of age, except for incapacity.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 99, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1235, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1329, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 398, § 3/SB 177.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the proviso at the end of subsection (i).

47-2-245.
Creditable service for secretaries of appellate court judges, superior court judges and district attorneys for certain prior services.

Any member who became a member by operation of Code Section 47-2-242 or 47-2-243 shall be eligible to obtain creditable service for all prior service as an officer or employee of a state court judge or a superior court judge while covered by a retirement or pension system operated by a county for county employees if such person has not yet begun receiving a retirement or disability benefit from such retirement or pension system.

To obtain creditable service under this Code section, the member must apply to the board of trustees not later than December 31, 2000, or within six months after becoming a member, whichever date is later, and must provide such evidence of such prior service as the board deems necessary. Upon notification in writing by the board of trustees of this retirement system, the board of trustees or other managing body of the local retirement or pension system shall transfer to this retirement system accumulated employer contributions and accumulated interest thereon which have been credited by the local retirement or pension system to each employee, and thereafter such person shall not be entitled to receive a benefit from such local retirement or pension system.

Upon receipt of the funds provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, the trustees shall grant to the member such creditable service as such amount will provide without creating any accrued liability, as a result of granting such creditable service, against this retirement system. If the amount of creditable service so obtained is less than the actual number of years of eligible service, the member is authorized, but not required, to obtain the difference by paying to the board of trustees an amount sufficient to grant such creditable service without creating any accrued liability, as a result of granting such creditable service, against this retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-245

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1109, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1271, § 1.